Mississippi statutes. Title 77. Public Utilities and Carriers
Article 1. Mississippi Rural Electrification Authority.

§ 77-5-1.
Short title.

This article may be cited as the “State Rural Electrification Authority Law.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5500; Laws, 1936, ch. 183.

§ 77-5-3.
Definitions.

The following terms, whenever used in this article, shall have the following meanings, unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context:

“Authority” shall mean the corporation created by this article.

“Board” shall mean the board of directors of the authority.

“Bonds” shall mean and include negotiable bonds, interim certificates or receipts, notes, debentures and all other evidences of indebtedness either issued or the payment thereof assumed by the authority.

“Acquire” shall mean and include construct, acquire by purchase, lease, devise, gift or the exercise of the power of eminent domain, or other mode of acquisition.

“Person” or “inhabitant” shall mean and include natural persons, firms, associations, corporations, business trusts, partnerships and bodies politic.

“Energy” shall mean and include any and all electric energy, no matter how or where generated or produced.

“System” shall mean and include any plant, works, system facilities, or properties, or parts thereof, together with all appurtenances thereto, used or useful in connection with the generation, production, transmission or distribution of energy.

“State” shall mean the State of Mississippi.

“Municipality” shall mean any incorporated city, town or village of the state.

“Federal agency” shall mean and include the United States of America, the President of the United States of America, Tennessee Valley Authority, the Federal Emergency Administrator of Public Works, the Administrator of the Rural Electrification Administration, and any and all other authorities, agencies, and instrumentalities of the United States of America, heretofore or hereafter created.

“Improve” shall mean and include construct, reconstruct, improve, repair, extend, enlarge or alter.

“Service” shall mean and include the sale or other disposition of energy at the lowest cost consistent with sound economy, public advantage and the prudent conduct of the business of the authority.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5501; Laws, 1936, ch. 183.

§ 77-5-5.
Mississippi Rural Electrification Authority created.

A corporation, to be known as the “Mississippi Rural Electrification Authority,” is hereby created as an agency of the state. Said authority shall be a public corporation in perpetuity under its corporate name, and shall under that name be a body politic and corporate.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5502; Laws, 1936, ch. 183.

§ 77-5-7.
Board of directors of authority.

The authority shall have a board of directors. The powers of the authority shall be vested in and exercised by a majority of the members of the board then in office.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5503; Laws, 1936, ch. 183.

§ 77-5-9.
Number, appointment, removal and terms of board of directors.

The board shall consist of three members who shall be appointed by the governor of the state, one (1) each from the three (3) supreme court districts of the state. The first appointment of members of the board shall be made by the governor by April 10, 1936. The term of office of the members of the board first appointed shall be one (1), two (2) and three (3) years, respectively, dating from the first day of the month in which the last of such appointments is made, and thereafter the term of office of the directors shall be three years. Directors shall hold office until their successors are appointed and qualify, and directors shall be eligible for reappointment. An appointment to fill a vacancy shall be for the unexpired term. The governor may remove any member of the board within the term for which such member shall have been appointed, giving to such member a copy of the charges against him and an opportunity to be heard in his defense.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5504; Laws, 1936, ch. 183.

§ 77-5-11.
Organization of board; officers.

Promptly after appointment the board shall meet to organize. At such meeting and at the first meeting in each year thereafter, the members shall choose from their number a president and a secretary.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5505; Laws, 1936, ch. 183.

§ 77-5-13.
Compensation of members of board.

The members of the board shall not be entitled to compensation for their services but they shall be entitled to reimbursement for all expenses incurred in connection with the performance of their duties, and to an honorarium of not more than six hundred dollars ($ 600.00) per year as the governor may decide, payable monthly.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5506; Laws, 1936, ch. 183.

§ 77-5-15.
Members of board shall not hold full time state office.

The members of the board shall not hold any full time salaried public office under the state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5507; Laws, 1936, ch. 183.

§ 77-5-17.
Powers of board.

The board shall have power to do all things necessary or convenient in conducting the business of the authority, including, but not limited to:

The power to adopt and amend by-laws for the management and regulation of its affairs and the business in which it is engaged;

To use, with the consent of a municipality, the agents, employees or facilities of such municipality and to provide for payment of the agreed proportion of the costs therefor;

To appoint officers, agents and employees and to fix their compensation;

To inquire into any matter relating to the affairs of the authority, to compel by subpoena the attendance of witnesses and the production of books and papers material to any such inquiry, to administer oaths to witnesses and to examine witnesses and such books and papers;

To appoint an advisory board to assist in the formation of proper policies in respect to the business of the authority;

To execute instruments;

To delegate to one or more of its members, or to its agents and employees, such powers and duties as it may deem proper.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5508; Laws, 1936, ch. 183.

§ 77-5-19.
Corporate purpose of the authority.

The corporate purpose of the authority is to encourage and promote the fullest possible use of energy by all of the inhabitants of the state by rendering service to said inhabitants, to whom energy is not available or, in the opinion of the board, is not available at reasonable rates.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5509; Laws, 1936, ch. 183.

§ 77-5-21.
General grant of powers to authority.

The authority is hereby vested with all powers necessary or requisite for the accomplishment of its corporate purpose and capable of being delegated by the legislature of this state. No enumeration of particular powers granted shall be construed to impair any general grant of power herein contained, or to limit any such grant to a power or powers of the same class or classes as those so enumerated.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5510; Laws, 1936, ch. 183.

§ 77-5-23.
Grant of specific powers to authority.

The authority shall have power:

To sue and be sued.

To have a seal and alter the same at pleasure.

To render service to the inhabitants of the state and, by contract or contracts with any person, federal agency or municipality or by its own employees, to acquire, own, operate, maintain and improve a system or systems.

To acquire, hold and dispose of property, real and personal, tangible and intangible, or interests therein, in its own name, subject to mortgages or other liens or otherwise and to pay therefor in cash or on credit, and to secure and procure payment of all or any part of the purchase price thereof on such terms and conditions as the board shall determine.

To cause surveys to be made of areas throughout the state for the purpose of determining the economic soundness of the acquisition of a system or systems therein, to make plans and estimates of the cost of such system or systems and in connection therewith to enter on any lands, waters and premises for the purpose of making such surveys, soundings and examinations.

To have complete control and supervision of the system or systems and to make such rules and regulations governing the rendering of service thereby as, in the judgment of the board, may be just and equitable.

To fix, maintain and collect rates and charges for service.

To use any right of way, easement or other similar property right necessary or convenient in connection with the acquisition, improvement, operation or maintenance of a system or systems, held by the state or any political subdivision thereof, provided, that the governing body of such political subdivision shall consent to such use.

To execute all instruments necessary or convenient including, but not limited to, indentures of trust, leases, and bonds.

To borrow money and issue bonds and to provide for the rights of the holders thereof.

To accept gifts or grants of money or property, real or personal, and voluntary and uncompensated services from any person, federal agency or municipality.

To condemn any land, easements, or rights of way, either on, under, or above the ground as the board may deem necessary for any of the purposes mentioned in this article, and such property or interest in such property may be so acquired whether or not the same is owned or held for public use by corporations, associations or persons having the power of eminent domain or otherwise held or used for public purposes. Such power of condemnation may be exercised in the mode or method of procedure prescribed by Chapter 27, Title 11, of the Mississippi Code of 1972, or in the mode or method of procedure prescribed by any other applicable statutory provisions now in force or hereafter enacted for the exercise of the power of eminent domain. Where condemnation proceedings become necessary the judge of the circuit court in which such proceedings are filed shall upon application of the authority and upon the deposit in the court, to the use of the person or persons lawfully entitled thereto, of such an amount as the judge may deem necessary to assure just compensation, order that the right of possession shall issue immediately or as soon and upon such terms as the judge, in his discretion, may deem proper and just. Upon application of the parties in interest, the judge may order that the money deposited in the court, or any part thereof, be paid forthwith for or on account of the just compensation to be awarded in said proceedings.

To make any and all contracts necessary or convenient for the full exercise of the powers herein granted, including, but not limited to, contracts with any person, federal agency, or municipality (a) for the purchase or sale of energy, (b) for the management and conduct of the business of the authority or any part thereof, and (c) for the acquisition of all or part of any system or systems. In connection with any such contract the authority shall have the power to stipulate and agree to such covenants, terms and conditions as the board may deem appropriate, including, but without limitations, covenants, terms and conditions with respect to the resale rates, financial and accounting methods, services, operation and maintenance practices, and the manner of disposing of the revenues of the system or systems conducted and operated by the authority.

To do any and all acts and things herein authorized or necessary or convenient to carry out the powers expressly given in this article under, through or by means of its own officers, agents and employees, or by contracts with any person, federal agency or municipality.

To pledge all or any part of its revenues and to mortgage or otherwise incumber all or any part of its property for the purpose of securing the payment of the principal and interest on any of its bonds or other obligations.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5511; Laws, 1936, ch. 183.

§ 77-5-25.
Operations outside of state authorized.

To the extent necessary in the judgment of the board to make effective the powers conferred by this article, the authority shall have the power to acquire, own, operate, maintain and/or improve a generating and/or transmission system or systems outside the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5512; Laws, 1936, ch. 183.

§ 77-5-27.
Issuance of bonds by authority.

The authority shall have power and is hereby authorized from time to time to issue its bonds in anticipation of its revenues, for any corporate purpose. Said bonds may be authorized by resolution or resolutions of the board, and may be issued in one or more series, may bear such date or dates, mature at such time to times not exceeding twenty-five (25) years from their respective dates, bear interest at such rate or rates, not exceeding that allowed in Section 75-17-103, Mississippi Code of 1972, payable semiannually, be in such denominations, be in such form, either coupon or registered, be executed in such manner, be payable in such medium of payment, at such place or places, be subject to such terms of redemption, with or without premium, and be declared or become due before the maturity date thereof, as such resolution or resolutions may provide. Said bonds may be issued for money or property, at public or private sale for such price or prices, as the board shall determine. The interest cost to maturity of the money or property (at its value as determined by the board, the determination of which shall be conclusive) received for any issue of said bonds, shall not exceed the rate allowed in Section 75-17-103, Mississippi Code of 1972. Said bonds may be repurchased by the authority out of any available funds at a price not to exceed the principal amount thereof and accrued interest, and all bonds so repurchased shall be canceled. Pending the preparation or execution of definitive bonds, interim receipts or certificates, or temporary bonds may be delivered to the purchaser or purchasers of said bonds. Any provision of law to the contrary notwithstanding, any bonds and the interest coupons appertaining thereto, if any, issued pursuant to this article shall possess all of the qualities of negotiable instruments.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5513; Laws, 1936, ch. 183; Laws, 1982, ch. 434, § 35; Laws, 1983, ch. 541, § 43, eff from and after passage (approved April 25, 1983).

§ 77-5-29.
Validity of bonds.

Said bonds bearing the signature of officers in office on the date of the signing thereof shall be valid and binding obligations notwithstanding that before the delivery thereof and payment therefor any or all the persons whose signatures appear thereon shall have ceased to be officers. The validity of said bonds shall not be dependent on nor be affected by the validity or regularity of any proceedings relating to the acquisition or improvement of the system or systems for which said bonds are issued. The resolution or resolutions authorizing said bonds may provide that the bonds shall contain a recital that they are issued pursuant to this article, which recital shall be conclusive evidence of their validity and of the regularity of their issuance.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5514; Laws, 1936, ch. 183.

§ 77-5-31.
Bonds of authority not debts of state.

No holder or holders of any bonds issued under this article shall ever have the right to compel any exercise of the taxing power of the state or of any political subdivision thereof to pay said bonds or the interest thereon. Each bond issued under this article shall recite in substance that said bond, including the interest thereon, is payable from the revenues pledged to the payment thereof, and that said bond does not constitute a debt of the state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5515; Laws, 1936, ch. 183.

§ 77-5-33.
Rates, fees and charges; application thereof.

The authority shall not be operated for gain or profit or primarily as a source of revenue to the state. The authority shall, however, prescribe and collect reasonable rates, fees or charges for the services, facilities and commodities made available by it, and shall revise such rates, fees or charges from time to time whenever necessary so that the authority shall be and always remain self-supporting, and shall not require appropriations by the state to enable it to carry out its purpose. The rates, fees, or charges prescribed shall be such as will produce revenue at least sufficient (a) to pay when due all bonds and interest thereon, for the payment of which such revenue is or shall have been pledged, charged or otherwise incumbered, including reserves therefor, and (b) to provide for all expenses of operation, maintenance or improvement of the system or systems acquired by the authority, including reserves therefor. Any surplus thereafter remaining shall be devoted solely to the reduction of rates.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5516; Laws, 1936, ch. 183.

§ 77-5-35.
Pledge of state to bondholders that it will not impair rate-making power of authority.

The state does pledge to and agree with the holders of bonds issued by the authority that the state will not limit or alter the rights and powers vested in the authority to fix and collect such rates, fees and charges as may be necessary or advisable in order to produce sufficient revenue to meet all expenses of maintenance and operation of its system or systems and to fulfill the terms of any agreements made with the holders of such bonds, or in any way impair the rights and remedies of the holders of such bonds, until such bonds together with interest thereon, and interest on any unpaid installments of interest, and all costs and expenses in connection with any suits, actions or proceedings by or on behalf of such bondholders are fully paid and discharged.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5517; Laws, 1936, ch. 183.

§ 77-5-37.
Security for bonds.

In connection with the issuance of bonds or in order to secure the payment of its bonds, the authority incorporated under this article shall have power:

To pledge all or any part of its revenues.

To vest in a trustee or trustees the right to enforce any covenant made to secure, to pay, or in relation to its bonds, to provide for the powers and duties of such trustee or trustees, to limit the liabilities thereof, and to provide the terms and conditions upon which the trustee or trustees or the holders of bonds or any amount or proportion of them may enforce any such covenant.

To make such covenants and to do any and all such acts and things as may be necessary or convenient or desirable in order to secure its bonds or which, in the absolute discretion of the board, tend to make the bonds more marketable notwithstanding that such covenants, acts and things may restrict or interfere with the exercise of the powers granted in this article, it being the intention hereof to give the authority power to do all things in the issuance of bonds, and for their security, that a private business corporation can do under the general laws of the state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5518; Laws, 1936, ch. 183.

§ 77-5-39.
Rights and remedies of bondholders.

In addition to all other rights and all other remedies, any holders of bonds of the authority, including a trustee for bondholders, shall have the right by mandamus or other suit, action or proceeding, at law or in equity, to enforce their rights against the authority and the board of the authority, including the right to require the authority and such board to fix and collect rates and charges adequate to carry out any agreement as to, or pledge of, the revenues produced by such rate or charges, and to require the authority and such board to carry out any other covenants and agreements with such bondholders and to perform its and their duties under this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5519; Laws, 1936, ch. 183.

§ 77-5-41.
Moneys of the authority.

All moneys of the authority, from whatever source derived, shall be deposited in one or more banks or trust companies and, if the authority shall so require, each of such accounts shall be continuously secured by a pledge of direct obligations of the United States of America or of the State of Mississippi having an aggregate market value, exclusive of accrued interest, at all times at least equal to the balance on deposit in such account or accounts. Such securities shall either be deposited with the authority or held by a trustee or agent satisfactory to the authority. In lieu of any such pledge of such securities, said deposits may be secured by a surety bond or bonds which shall be in form, sufficiency and substance satisfactory to the authority.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5520; Laws, 1936, ch. 183.

§ 77-5-43.
Assets of authority shall pass to state upon cessation of authority’s existence.

In the event that the authority shall cease to exist, all of its assets remaining after all of its obligations and liabilities have been satisfied or discharged shall pass to and become the property of the state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5521; Laws, 1936, ch. 183.

§ 77-5-45.
Authority and its property subject to taxation.

The authority and its property shall be liable for taxes and shall be taxed and assessed in the same manner and to the same extent as a privately owned utility.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5522; Laws, 1936, ch. 183.

§ 77-5-47.
Right of way over certain state lands granted to associations and corporations operating under this article.

All associations or corporations formed and operating under this article are hereby authorized and empowered to construct electric lines on and over all of those lands matured in the State of Mississippi through tax sale, and also on and over unimproved sixteenth sections, and lands granted in lieu of sixteenth sections.

The right and power to construct and maintain said lines shall be during the existence of said corporation or association, and without payment to the state for said easement.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5525; Laws, 1938, ch. 249.

§ 77-5-49.
Article complete in itself.

This article is complete in itself and shall be controlling. The provisions of any other law, general, special, or local, except as provided in this article, shall not limit or restrict the powers granted by this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5523; Laws, 1936, ch. 183.